Washington statutes.
RCW 9.03.020

Permitting unused equipment to remain on premises.

Any owner, lessee, or manager who knowingly permits such an unused refrigerator, icebox, or deep freeze locker to remain on the premises under his or her control without having the door removed or a portion of the latch mechanism removed to prevent latching or locking of the door is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 286; 1955 c 298 s 2.]